Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 5

Mandatory Community-Based Services

33-5-501. Mandatory community-based services for felony defendant found incompetent to stand trial.

IF AND ONLY IF

a court with criminal jurisdiction finds on proof by clear and convincing evidence that an adult with an intellectual disability is:

charged with a felony,

incompetent to stand trial,

not committable under § 33-5-403, AND

at risk of becoming committable; AND

the department certifies to the court that there are funds available within the limits of the department's line item appropriation for services under this section for service to the person,

THEN

the court may order the person to participate in community-based services under a plan approved and developed by the department to attain and maintain competence to stand trial and reduce the risk of becoming committable.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 5, §§ 33-5-101, 33-5-105, 33-5-201, 33-5-301 — 33-5-303, 33-5-305 — 33-5-310, 33-5-401 — 33-5-412 (Acts 1971, ch. 289, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 4; 1976, ch. 764, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 3; 1978, ch. 667, § 2; 1980, ch. 822, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 5, 6, 10; 1982, ch. 862, § 2; 1983, ch. 323, § 10; T.C.A., §§ 33-313, 33-501, 33-505 — 33-507, 33-510, 33-515, 33-516, 33-523, 33-524, 33-1601; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 6, 8-11; 1988, ch. 828, § 2; 1989, ch. 504, § 1; 1992, ch. 981, §§ 2-13, 15; 1992, ch. 991, § 14; 1993, ch. 283, § 1; 1994, ch. 683, § 1; 1995, ch. 468, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-5-102 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-502), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-103 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-503), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-104 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-504), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; and § 33-5-304 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1978, ch. 527, § 2; 1978, ch. 667, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-508), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

In order to effectuate the purposes of this section, funds were appropriated in Acts 2000, ch. 994.

For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

33-5-502. Mandatory community-based services for felony defendant found not guilty due to insanity based on an intellectual disability.

IF AND ONLY IF

a court with criminal jurisdiction finds on proof by clear and convincing evidence that a person with an intellectual disability:

is charged with a felony,

is acquitted of the charge on a verdict of not guilty by reason of insanity because of an intellectual disability at the time of the commission of the crime,

is not committable under § 33-5-403,

requires training or treatment because of the intellectual disability, AND

is likely to meet the standards of § 33-5-403 without the training or treatment, AND

the department certifies to the court that there are funds available within the limits of the department's line item appropriation for services under this section for service to the person,

THEN

the court may order the person to participate in community-based services under a plan approved and developed by the department to avoid deterioration to the point where the person would be committable.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 5, §§ 33-5-101, 33-5-105, 33-5-201, 33-5-301 — 33-5-303, 33-5-305 — 33-5-310, 33-5-401 — 33-5-412 (Acts 1971, ch. 289, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 4; 1976, ch. 764, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 3; 1978, ch. 667, § 2; 1980, ch. 822, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 5, 6, 10; 1982, ch. 862, § 2; 1983, ch. 323, § 10; T.C.A., §§ 33-313, 33-501, 33-505 — 33-507, 33-510, 33-515, 33-516, 33-523, 33-524, 33-1601; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 6, 8-11; 1988, ch. 828, § 2; 1989, ch. 504, § 1; 1992, ch. 981, §§ 2-13, 15; 1992, ch. 991, § 14; 1993, ch. 283, § 1; 1994, ch. 683, § 1; 1995, ch. 468, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-5-102 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-502), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-103 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-503), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-104 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-504), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; and § 33-5-304 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1978, ch. 527, § 2; 1978, ch. 667, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-508), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

In order to effectuate the purposes of this section, funds were appropriated in Acts 2000, ch. 994. Funding was provided in Acts 2000, ch. 994.

For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

33-5-503. Mandatory community-based services for capital defendant committed under § 33-5-403 but no longer meeting the standards for commitment.

IF AND ONLY IF

a court with criminal jurisdiction finds on proof by clear and convincing evidence that a person with an intellectual disability:

has been committed under § 33-5-403 in connection with a capital offense or with a verdict of not guilty by reason of insanity on a capital offense,

no longer meets the standards under which the person was committed, AND

has a condition that requires training or treatment without which the person would again meet commitment standards, AND

the department certifies to the court that there are funds available within the limits of the department's line item appropriation for services under this section for service to the person,

THEN

the court may order the person to participate in community-based services under a plan approved and developed by the department to prevent the person's deterioration to the point where the person would be committable.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 5, §§ 33-5-101, 33-5-105, 33-5-201, 33-5-301 — 33-5-303, 33-5-305 — 33-5-310, 33-5-401 — 33-5-412 (Acts 1971, ch. 289, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 4; 1976, ch. 764, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 3; 1978, ch. 667, § 2; 1980, ch. 822, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 5, 6, 10; 1982, ch. 862, § 2; 1983, ch. 323, § 10; T.C.A., §§ 33-313, 33-501, 33-505 — 33-507, 33-510, 33-515, 33-516, 33-523, 33-524, 33-1601; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 6, 8-11; 1988, ch. 828, § 2; 1989, ch. 504, § 1; 1992, ch. 981, §§ 2-13, 15; 1992, ch. 991, § 14; 1993, ch. 283, § 1; 1994, ch. 683, § 1; 1995, ch. 468, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-5-102 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-502), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-103 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-503), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-104 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-504), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; and § 33-5-304 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1978, ch. 527, § 2; 1978, ch. 667, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-508), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

In order to effectuate the purposes of this section, funds were appropriated in Acts 2000, ch. 994. Funding was provided in Acts 2000, ch. 994.

For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Collateral References.

Propriety of transferring patient found not guilty by reason of insanity to less restrictive confinement. 43 A.L.R.5th 777.

33-5-504. Development of community-based services plan — Maximum duration.

If upon completion of an evaluation of a person under § 33-5-403 or § 33-5-408, the department determines that the person meets the standards in § 33-5-501, § 33-5-502, or § 33-5-503, the department shall attempt to develop a community-based services plan for the person for the purpose stated. The plan shall be for a maximum of two (2) years, and no person shall participate in the plan for more than two (2) years.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-5-505. Hearing on contest of plan.

If a defendant contests a plan proposed by the department under § 33-5-501, § 33-5-502, or § 33-5-503, the court shall hold a hearing within seven (7) days of receipt of the request to determine whether the plan is programmatically appropriate and legally permissible. The court shall either approve the plan or approve the plan as modified by the department to correct deficiencies found by the court.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-5-506. Assessment of service recipient's needs and progress — Report to court.

A service provider with a service recipient under § 33-5-501, § 33-5-502, or § 33-5-503 shall assess the service recipient's needs at least every six (6) months and shall report to the court every six (6) months on the person's progress toward the goal of the plan and on the person's use of the service. A service provider may request the court to release the service recipient from the plan at any time.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-5-507. Termination of community-based services.

If, after two (2) years of intensive training on a department-approved competence to stand trial curriculum under § 33-5-501, the defendant has not made substantial progress to attain competence to stand trial, the service provider shall assess the defendant's needs and may terminate the service plan and recommend to the court that the defendant be referred to other mental health or intellectual disability services as deemed appropriate. The service provider shall report its conclusion to the court before terminating services.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.